Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1909
Voice stress analyzer, defined.

A voice stress analyzer shall mean a mechanical or electronic instrument capable of recording the human voice, which detects and measures pitch, amplitude, frequency, and other components of the human voice for the purpose of attempting to determine truth or deception, and whose records are permanently and simultaneously recorded.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 9.